Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1213] Sale of produce, etc.;
disposition of proceeds; exceptions. Except as otherwise provided by law
or rules adopted by the governor, the sale by any governmental office,
department, board, establishment, institution, or agency (hereafter referred to
as "agency") of domestic animals such as hogs, poultry, etc.; of the
produce of animal husbandry; of fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural
produce; of manufactured articles; or the like (hereafter referred to as
"products") where the raising, production, or manufacture of the same
is a part of the usual or authorized activities of the agency, may be made by
the agency in a manner to be determined by the head of the agency. The
proceeds of the sales, where not otherwise provided by law, shall be paid into
the general fund as state realizations. If any of the products are sold from
one agency to any other agency, a reasonable sale price may be paid to the
selling agency by the purchasing agency and credited to the current expense
appropriation of the selling agency, subject to re-expenditure during the
fiscal or other period in which the current expense appropriation is available,
and any unexpended balance shall lapse at the end of the period. This section
shall not apply to public school activities, such as the sale of food in public
school cafeterias, the proceeds of which are not considered as public funds
payable into the treasury of the State, nor shall the same apply to activities
of the University of Hawaii. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to
prohibit a transfer from one agency to another of the products without charge,
if so ordered by the selling agency. [L 1994, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next